Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7516.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 10-3-6 and 10-3-15 of the General Laws in Chapter 10-3 entitled
"Arbitration" are hereby amended to read as follows:
10-3-6. Judicial appointment of arbitrators.
(a) If, in the agreement, provision is made for a method of naming or appointing an
arbitrator or arbitrators or an umpire, the method shall be followed; but if no method is provided in
the agreement, or if a method is provided and any party thereto shall fail to avail himself or herself
of such method, or if for any other reason there shall be a lapse in the naming of an arbitrator or
arbitrators or an umpire, or in filling a vacancy, then, upon the application of either party to the
controversy, the court, as described in § 10-3-4, shall designate and appoint an arbitrator or
arbitrators or umpire, as the case may require, who shall act under the agreement with the same
force and effect as if he, she, or they had been specifically named in the agreement; and, unless
otherwise provided in the agreement, the arbitration shall be by a single arbitrator.
(b) The court shall appoint an arbitrator, appraiser, or umpire under this section upon a
showing that any party has failed, refused, or neglected to make a required appointment under the
agreement, or has otherwise caused an unreasonable delay in the naming or selection thereof.
Where the agreement contemplates that each party shall appoint an arbitrator or appraiser and that
the two (2) so appointed shall thereafter select an umpire or third arbitrator, the court shall, upon
application, appoint both an arbitrator or appraiser on behalf of the non-complying party and an

umpire or third arbitrator if necessary, to ensure that the arbitration or appraisal may proceed.
Judicial appointment under this section shall not be withheld on the ground that one party has failed
to make an appointment required by the agreement. The purpose of judicial appointment under this
section is to ensure that arbitration or appraisal proceedings proceed expeditiously and without
prejudice to the party that has complied with the agreement.
10-3-15. Notice of motion to vacate, modify, or correct award.
Notice of a motion to vacate, modify, or correct an award must be served upon the adverse
party or his or her attorney within sixty (60) thirty (30) days after the award is filed or delivered,
and before the award is confirmed, as prescribed by law for service of notice of a motion in an
action at law. The court may make an order, to be served with the notice of the motion, staying the
proceedings of the adverse party to enforce the award.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003738
========
LC003738 - Page 2 of 3